Hawaii statutes.
§125C-4 Adopting, filing, and taking effect
of rules. The governor or the governor's authorized representative shall
adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91, to insure that petroleum products are made
available to the public in an orderly, efficient, and safe manner, to become
effective when a shortage, as defined in section 125C-2, exists. If additional
and unforeseen measures are required to insure that petroleum products are
distributed in an orderly, efficient, and safe manner, the governor or the governor's
authorized representative may proceed without prior notice or hearing or upon
such abbreviated notice and hearing as the governor finds practicable to adopt
additional rules authorized under this chapter with the additional rules to be
effective for a period of not longer than one hundred twenty days without
renewal. Any rule so adopted may be amended or repealed by the governor
without prior notice or hearing or upon abbreviated notice and hearing prior to
the expiration of the one hundred twenty-day period; provided that no amendment
shall extend the rule beyond the original period of one hundred and twenty
days. To be effective after the one hundred twenty-day period, the rules shall
be adopted pursuant to chapter 91. Each rule adopted, amended, or repealed
shall become effective as adopted, amended, or repealed upon approval by the
governor and filing with the lieutenant governor. Each rule in effect shall
have force and effect of law, but the effect of each rule may be temporarily or
indefinitely suspended by the governor by written declaration filed with the
lieutenant governor. Each rule temporarily suspended shall take effect again
immediately upon expiration of the suspension period. Each rule indefinitely
suspended shall take effect immediately upon the filing with the lieutenant
governor of the written declaration by the governor terminating the suspension.
[L 1975, c 38, pt of §1; am L 1979, c 105, §10; am L 1981, c 18, §1; am L 1984,
c 238, §5; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 216, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next